Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1 Tennessee Securities Act of 1980
48-1-124. Scope of law — Service of process.

This part applies to persons who buy or sell securities from, in, or into this state, or who give or receive advice concerning the purchase or sale of securities from, in, or into this state.

For the purpose of this section, a purchase or sale is made in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when:

An offer that results in a sale originates from this state;

An offer to purchase or sell a security is accepted in this state; or

An offer that results in a sale is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed offer.

For the purpose of this section, an offer to buy or to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state and:

Has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in writing, outside this state; and

Whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it is directed (or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed acceptance).

Sections 48-1-109(a) and (c) and 48-1-121 apply when any act instrumental in effecting prohibited conduct is done in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state.

Every applicant for registration and renewal under this part, every person making a notice filing, and every issuer for whom a registration, exemption from registration, or notice filing or renewal is required under this part, shall file with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner or the commissioner's successor in office to be the applicant's or issuer's attorney-in-fact to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the applicant or issuer or the applicant's or issuer's successor, executor, or administrator, which arises under this part or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not effective unless:

The plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the defendant's or respondent's last address on file with the commissioner; and

The plaintiff's affidavit of compliance with this subsection (e) is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this part or any rule or order hereunder, and has not filed a consent to service of process under subsection (e) and personal jurisdiction over the person cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, the conduct shall be considered equivalent to the appointment of the commissioner or the commissioner's successor in office to be such person's attorney-in-fact to receive service of any lawful process to the same extent as if such person had filed a consent to service of process under subsection (e).

When process is served under this section, the court, or the commissioner in a proceeding before the commissioner, shall order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

Pursuant to Section 6(c) of the federal Philanthropy Protection Act of 1995, Public Law 104-62 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-3a(c)), this part shall not be preempted.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 24; T.C.A., § 48-16-124; Acts 1997, ch. 61, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-2-124; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 43-45.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-124 was transferred to § 48-1-124 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-1-125. Notice filing and fee requirements for covered securities.

Any issuer, except an issuer of any security that is a covered security under subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(D), which proposes to sell any security which is a covered security shall file with the commissioner, prior to a sale of such security in this state, a notice consisting of all documents filed with the securities and exchange commission, together with:

A consent to service of process as required under § 48-1-124(e), unless built into the notice filing form; and

A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

An issuer planning to offer and sell securities in this state in an offering pursuant to Tier 2 of Regulation A shall submit the following at least twenty-one (21) days prior to the initial sale in this state:

A completed Regulation A-Tier 2 notice filing form or copies of all documents filed with the securities and exchange commission;

A consent to service of process as required under § 48-1-124(e), if not filing on the Regulation A-Tier 2 notice filing form; and

A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

With respect to any security that is a covered security under § 18(b)(4)(C) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(4)(C)), the issuer shall file with the commissioner a notice consisting of:

A completed Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form or copies of all documents filed with the securities and exchange commission;

A consent to service of process as required under § 48-1-124(e), if not filing on the Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form; and

A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

If the issuer has its principal place of business in this state, the filing required under subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) shall be filed with the commissioner concurrently when the issuer files its initial Form C with the securities and exchange commission.

If the issuer does not have its principal place of business in this state but residents of this state have purchased fifty percent (50%) or greater of the aggregate amount of the offering, the filing required under subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) shall be filed when the issuer becomes aware that such purchases have met that threshold and, in any event, no later than thirty (30) days from the date of completion of the offering.

With respect to any security that is a covered security under § 18(b)(4)(E) of the Securities Act of 1933, the issuer shall file with the commissioner, no later than fifteen (15) days after the first sale of such covered security in this state, a notice consisting of:

Form D signed by the issuer; and

A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

After the initial offer of a covered security in this state, all documents that are part of an amendment to a federal registration statement or Form D filed with the securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.), shall be filed concurrently with the commissioner.

All documents referred to in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) that have been filed and recorded on the Electronic Data Gathering Access and Retrieval (EDGAR) system, the Interactive Data Electronic Applications (IDEA) system, the Electronic Filing Depository (EFD), or any other electronic data gathering system either maintained by the securities and exchange commission or approved by the commissioner, may be utilized in lieu of filing such documents in paper form with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; provided, that the person making the notice filing provides an accurate filing number or other identifying designation issued by the securities and exchange commission, and that a printed or electronically stored copy is immediately accessible to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

Notice filings made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) are effective for one (1) year commencing on the later of the notice filing date or the securities and exchange commission effective date. Notice filings may be renewed by making a filing and paying a fee as provided under subdivision (a)(1)(A) no later than the close of business on the tenth business day prior to the date of expiration.

Notice filings made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) are effective for one (1) year from the date of filing and may be renewed by making a filing as required by subdivision (a)(1)(B) and paying a nonrefundable renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

Notice filings made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) are effective for one (1) year from the date of filing and may be renewed by making a filing as required by subdivision (a)(1)(C) and paying a nonrefundable renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

Notice filings made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(D) are effective for one (1) year from the date of filing unless the issuer conducts a continuous offering and files concurrent amendments as required by subdivision (a)(2) and pays a nonrefundable renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

The commissioner may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a covered security, except a covered security under § 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(1)), upon a finding that:

The order is in the public interest; and

There is a failure to comply with any filing or fee required under this part.

Any issuer of a covered security that does not promptly remedy a delay in payment of any fee or promptly remedy a delay in making any filing required under this part shall be deemed not to have complied with such filing or fee requirements. For purposes of this subdivision (c)(2), an issuer will have promptly remedied a delay in payment or filing if the issuer remits the required fee or filing within ten (10) business days of receipt of notification of the delay or underpayment.

When any amendment to a notice filing filed under this section changes the name of the offering of securities, the issuer shall pay a processing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), payable upon filing the amendment with the commissioner.

Acts 1997, ch. 164, § 8; 2001, ch. 61, §§ 15-17; 2010, ch. 697, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-2-125; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 46.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-125 was transferred to § 48-1-125 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

48-1-126. Exemptions from notice filing and fee requirements.

Notwithstanding § 48-1-125(a)(1)(A)(i) and (ii), the following covered securities are exempt from the notice filing and fee requirements set forth in § 48-1-125:

Any covered security sold to an institutional investor, as defined under § 48-1-102;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal securities registration pursuant to § 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal securities registration pursuant to § 3(a)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal securities registration pursuant to § 3(a)(5) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal securities registration pursuant to § 3(a)(6) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal securities registration pursuant to § 3(a)(7) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is sold in a transaction exempt from federal registration pursuant to § 3(a)(9) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is sold in a transaction exempt from federal registration pursuant to § 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal registration pursuant to § 3(a)(12) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is exempt from federal registration pursuant to § 3(a)(13) of the Securities Act of 1933;

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 48-1-102 and is determined, by rule or order of the commissioner, that such notice filing is not necessary for the protection of investors;

Any security issued by a unit investment trust that is registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), as amended, if:

The units have been the subject of a previous notice filing and fee under this part and have been sold;

The units are offered or sold by a broker-dealer registered under this part; and

The units are sold by or on behalf of a sponsor or depositor of the unit investment trust or affiliate of the sponsor or depositor; and

Any security that is defined to be a covered security pursuant to § 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, or will be such a covered security upon completion of the transaction.

Acts 1999, ch. 74, § 2; 2010, ch. 697, § 5; T.C.A., § 48-2-126; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 47.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-126 was transferred to § 48-1-126 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Section 3 of the Securities Act of 1933, referred to in this section, is codified in 15 U.S.C. § 77c.

48-1-127. Senior exploitation reporting and records.

If a qualified individual reasonably believes that financial exploitation of a designated adult has occurred, has been attempted or may have been attempted, or is being attempted, the qualified individual, in cooperation with the qualified individual's broker-dealer or investment adviser, may notify the commissioner.

Subsequent to notifying the commissioner, a qualified individual may, to the extent permitted under federal law, notify any of the following concerning the qualified individual's belief that financial exploitation may have occurred:

A relative of the designated adult as defined in § 71-6-102;

A legal guardian of the designated adult;

A trustee, co-trustee, or successor trustee of the account of the designated adult;

An agent under a power of attorney of the designated adult; or

Any other person permitted under existing laws, rules, regulations, or customer agreement.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser may delay a disbursement from an account of a designated adult or an account on which a designated adult is a beneficiary if:

The broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual reasonably believes, after initiating an internal review of the requested disbursement and the suspected financial exploitation, that the requested disbursement may result in financial exploitation of a designated adult; and

The broker-dealer or investment adviser:

Immediately, but in no event more than two (2) business days after the requested disbursement, provides written notification of the delay and the reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business on the account, unless any such party is reasonably believed to have engaged in or attempted financial exploitation of the designated adult;

Immediately, but in no event more than two (2) business days after the requested disbursement, notifies the commissioner; and

Continues its internal review of the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the designated adult, as necessary, and reports any additional results to the commissioner within seven (7) business days after the requested disbursement.

The commissioner is authorized to establish additional disbursement-delay guidelines by rules promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any delay of a disbursement as authorized by this section shall expire upon the sooner of:

A determination by the broker-dealer or investment adviser that the disbursement will not result in financial exploitation of the designated adult; or

Fifteen (15) business days after the date on which the broker-dealer or investment adviser first delayed disbursement of the funds, unless the commissioner requests that the broker-dealer or investment adviser extends the delay, in which case the delay shall expire no more than twenty-five (25) business days after the date on which the broker-dealer or investment adviser first delayed disbursement of the funds unless otherwise terminated or extended by the commissioner or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

A court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order extending the delay of the disbursement of funds or an order granting other protective relief based on the petition of the commissioner, the broker-dealer or investment adviser that initiated the delay under this section, or any other interested party.

A broker-dealer, investment adviser, or qualified individual that, in good faith and exercising reasonable care, complies with subsections (a) and (b) is immune from liability for such conduct.

A broker-dealer or investment adviser shall provide access to or copies of records that are relevant to the suspected financial exploitation of a designated adult to the commissioner. The records may include historical records or records relating to the most recent disbursement as well as disbursements that comprise the suspected financial exploitation of a designated adult. All records made available to the commissioner under this section shall not be open to inspection by members of the public under § 10-7-503.

Acts 2017, ch. 242, § 48.